California, session 20252026, AB1371.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 6311 of the Labor Code is repealed.6311.No employee shall be laid off or discharged for refusing to perform work in the performance of which this code, including Section 6400, any occupational safety or health standard, or any safety order of the division or standards board will be violated, where the violation would create a real and apparent hazard to the employee or their fellow employees. Any employee who is laid off or discharged in violation of this section or is otherwise not paid because the employee refused to perform work in the performance of which this code, any occupational safety or health standard, or any safety order of the division or standards board will be violated and where the violation would create a real and apparent hazard to the employee or their fellow employees shall have a right of action for wages for the time the employee is without work as a result of the layoff or discharge. Notwithstanding Section 6303 or other law, as used in this section, “employee” includes a domestic work employee, except for a person who performs household domestic service that is publicly funded, including publicly funded household domestic service provided to a recipient, client, or beneficiary with a share of cost in that service.SEC. 2. Section 6311 is added to the Labor Code, to read:6311. (a) For purposes of this section:(1) “Injury or illness” means an abnormal condition or disorder. “Injury” includes, but is not limited to, a cut, fracture, sprain, or amputation. “Illness” means both acute and chronic illnesses, including, but not limited to, a respiratory disorder, poisoning, or heat illness.(2) “Hazard” means a condition, practice, or act that could result in an injury or illness to an employee.(b) An employee, acting in good faith, may refuse to perform a task assigned by an employer if all of the following apply:(1) Either of the following apply:(A) The performance of that task will violate this code, any occupational safety or health standard, or any safety order of the division or the standards board, where the violation would create a real and apparent hazard to the employee or their fellow employees.(B) The employee has a reasonable apprehension that the performance of the assigned task would result in injury or illness to the employee or other employees.(2) Insofar as it is reasonably practicable, the employee or any other employee has communicated or otherwise attempted to notify the employer of the safety or health risk.(3) The employer has failed to provide a response that is reasonably calculated to allay the employee’s concerns regarding the safety or health risk associated with the assigned task.(c) For purposes of this section, an employee shall be considered to be acting in good faith if, under the same circumstances, a reasonable person would conclude that the performance of the assigned task would result in serious injury or illness to the employee or other employees.(d) (1) An employee or prospective employee who has exercised the right to refuse to perform a task assigned by an employer as afforded by this section shall receive full wages, as provided in paragraph (2), if the employee satisfies both of the following conditions:(A) The employee has refused to perform the assigned task in accordance with this section.(B) The employee has not been assigned a different task the performance of which would not pose a risk to the health and safety of the employee.(2) The employee shall continue to receive full wages during their scheduled work hours until the employer has notified the employee that the hazard has been abated and the employee can reasonably conclude that the task will no longer result in the risk of serious injury or illness to the employee or other employees.(e) (1) An employee who is laid off or discharged because the employee has exercised the rights afforded by this section shall have a right of action for wages for the time the employee is without work as a result of the layoff or discharge.(2) An employee who is not paid for their scheduled work hours in violation of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) shall have a right of action for those wages.(f) An employee’s refusal to perform an assigned task in accordance with this section shall not be grounds for any disciplinary action, for dismissal or suspension from employment, or for any other adverse employment action.(g) Any employee who has exercised the right to refuse to perform a task assigned by an employer as afforded by this section shall be covered by retaliation protections specified in Sections 98.6 and 1102.5.